Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.090

Admission of veterans—Establishment of requirements if discharged.

If an applicant under RCW 2.48.070 through 2.48.110 is, at the time he or she applies for admission to practice law in the state of Washington, no longer in the armed forces of the United States, he or she may establish the requirements of the proviso in RCW 2.48.070 as follows:

(1) If he or she shall have been an enlisted person, by producing documentation he or she is a veteran as defined by RCW 41.04.007, and by the certificates of at least two active members of the Washington state bar association.

(2) If he or she shall have been an officer, by an affidavit showing that he or she is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007, and by the certificates of at least two active members of the Washington state bar association.

[ 2024 c 146 s 7; 2011 c 336 s 64; 1945 c 181 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 138-7C.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.